Georgia statutes. 
(a) An enforcement board, upon notification by the code enforcement officer that an order of the enforcement board has not been complied with by the set time may order the violator to pay an administrative fine in an amount specified in this Code section.

(b) (1) An administrative fine imposed pursuant to this Code section for a violation involving the health or safety of a third party shall not exceed $1,000.00 per day.

(2) An administrative fine imposed pursuant to this Code section for a violation that is not a violation involving the health or safety of a third party shall not exceed a total of $1,000.00.

(3) In determining the amount of the fine, if any, the enforcement board shall consider the following factors:

(A) The gravity of the violation;

(B) Any actions taken by the violator to correct the violation; and

(C) Any previous violations committed by the violator.

(4) An enforcement board may reduce a fine imposed pursuant to this Code section.

(c) A certified copy of an order imposing an administrative fine may be recorded in the public records of any county and thereafter shall constitute a lien against the land on which the violation exists and upon any real or personal property owned by the violator. Upon petition to the superior court, such order may be enforced in the same manner as a court judgment by the sheriffs of this state, including levy against the personal property, but such order shall not be deemed to be a court judgment except for enforcement purposes. After three months from the filing of any such lien which remains unpaid, the enforcement board may request the local governing body attorney to foreclose on the lien.

(d) If an environmental court is in existence with jurisdiction over ordinances subject to the jurisdiction of the enforcement board, the violator may object to the fine imposed and submit to the jurisdiction of the environmental court. The case shall be transferred to the environmental court and handled de novo as an ordinance violation.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-9, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-26, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 163, § 4/HB 93.)

36-74-27. Length of liens.

Statute text

No lien imposed under this article shall continue for a period longer than 20 years after the certified copy of an order imposing a fine has been recorded, unless within that time an action to foreclose on the lien is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction. In an action to foreclose on a lien, the prevailing party is entitled to recover all costs, including a reasonable attorney's fee, that it incurs in the foreclosure. The continuation of the lien effected by the commencement of the action shall not be good against creditors or subsequent purchasers for valuable consideration without notice, unless a notice of lis pendens is recorded.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-10, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-27, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-28. Appeals to superior court.

Statute text

An aggrieved party, including the local governing body, may appeal a final administrative order of an enforcement board to the superior court. Such an appeal shall be a hearing de novo. An appeal shall be filed within 30 days of the execution of the order to be appealed.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-11, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-28, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-29. Notice required; form of notice.

Statute text

(a) All notices required by this article shall be provided to the alleged violator by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested; by hand delivery by the sheriff or other law enforcement officer, code enforcement officer, or other person designated by the local governing body; or by leaving the notice at the violator's usual place of residence with any person residing therein who is above 15 years of age and informing such person of the contents of the notice.

(b) In addition to providing notice as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, at the option of the code enforcement board, notice may also be served by publication or posting, as follows:

(1) Notice may be published once during each week for four consecutive weeks (four publications being sufficient) in the newspaper in which the sheriff's advertisements are printed in the county where the code enforcement board is located. Proof of publication shall be made by affidavit of a duly authorized representative of the newspaper;

(2) If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the county where the code enforcement board is located, three copies of such notice shall be posted for at least 28 days in three different and conspicuous places in such county, one of which shall be at the front door of the courthouse in said county. Proof of posting shall be by affidavit of the person posting the notice, which affidavit shall include a copy of the notice posted and the date and places of its posting; or

(3) Notice by publication or posting may run concurrently with, or may follow, an attempt or attempts to provide notice by hand delivery, mail, or statutory overnight delivery as required under subsection (a) of this Code section. Evidence that an attempt has been made to deliver notice by hand, mail, or statutory overnight delivery as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, together with proof of publication or posting as provided in this subsection, shall be sufficient to show that the notice requirements of this Code section have been met, without regard to whether or not the alleged violator actually received such notice.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-12, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1212, § 5; Code 1981, § 36-74-29, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 163, § 5/HB 93.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 1212, § 7, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2001.

36-74-30. Other enforcement methods; probable cause for investigation required.

Statute text

(a) It is the intent of this article to provide an additional or supplemental means of obtaining compliance with local codes. Nothing contained in this article shall prohibit a local governing body through its code enforcement officer from enforcing its codes by any other lawful means including criminal and civil proceedings; provided, however, that a local governing body shall not pursue a specific instance of an alleged violation of an ordinance against one violator before both a code enforcement board and a magistrate, municipal, or other court authorized to hear ordinance violations.

(b) No local government is authorized to perform investigations or inspections of residential rental property unless there is probable cause to believe there is or has been a violation or violations of applicable codes, and in no event may a local government require the registration of residential rental property. Conditions which appear to be code violations which are in plain view may form the basis for probable cause.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-13, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-30, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 818, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 163, § 6/HB 93.)

——————————

ARTICLE 3

ENFORCEMENT BOARDS CREATED PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2003

36-74-40. Application of article.

Statute text

The provisions of this article shall apply to enforcement boards created prior to January 1, 2003.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-40, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-41. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Code inspector" means any authorized agent or employee of the county or municipality whose duty it is to assure code compliance.

(2) "County or municipal codes and ordinances" means zoning ordinances and resolutions, ordinances and resolutions enacting subdivision regulations, environmental ordinances and resolutions, state minimum standard codes provided for in Code Section 8-2-25, ordinances and resolutions enacted pursuant to Code Section 8-2-25, other ordinances and resolutions regulating the development of real property, and ordinances and regulations providing for control of litter and debris, control of junked or abandoned vehicles, and control of overgrown vegetation. Notwithstanding the above, the term "county and municipal codes and ordinances" shall not include:

(A) Those codes and ordinances requiring a permit, unless the alleged violator has failed to secure all necessary valid permits under said codes and ordinances; or

(B) Any local amendments to the state minimum standard codes provided for in Code Section 8-2-25 that have not been adopted in conformity with the requirements of subsection (c) of Code Section 8-2-25.

(3) "Enforcement board" means a local government code enforcement board.

(4) "Local governing body" means the governing authority of the county or municipality, however designated.

(5) "Local governing body attorney" means the legal counselor for the county or municipality.

(6) "Repeat violation" means any violation of county or municipal codes or ordinances by an owner or co-owner whom the enforcement board has previously found to be in violation of a code or ordinance within one year prior to such violation.

(7) "Violation involving the health or safety of a third party" means a violation that creates a legitimate concern for the health and safety of a third-party occupant of a dwelling place or that creates an immediate and substantial danger to the environment or members of the community at large, especially minor children.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-41, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-42. Membership of boards; requirements of members; chairperson; attorney's role.

Statute text

(a) The local governing body may appoint one or more code enforcement boards and legal counsel for the enforcement boards. The local governing body may appoint code enforcement boards consisting of three, five, or seven members. The local governing body may appoint up to two alternate members for each code enforcement board to serve on the board in the absence of board members.

(b) Members of the enforcement boards shall be residents of the municipality, in the case of municipal enforcement boards, or residents of the county, in the case of county enforcement boards. In making appointments to an enforcement board, the local governing body shall make good faith efforts to appoint one or more individuals who have experience or expertise relevant to one or more of the county or municipal codes that are within the subject matter jurisdiction of the respective enforcement board, including individuals with property management and litter control experience; provided, however, that the authority and jurisdiction of an enforcement board shall not in any way be limited due to the absence from its membership of one or more individuals with such experience or expertise.

(c) (1) The initial appointments to a seven-member code enforcement board shall be as follows:

(A) Three members appointed for a term of two years each; and

(B) Four members appointed for a term of four years each.

(2) The initial appointments to a five-member code enforcement board shall be as follows:

(A) Two members appointed for a term of two years each; and

(B) Three members appointed for a term of four years each.

(3) The initial appointments to a three-member code enforcement board shall be as follows:

(A) One member appointed for a term of two years; and

(B) Two members appointed for a term of four years each.

(4) Upon the expiration of the initial terms specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection all terms shall be for three years.

(5) The local governing body of a county or a municipality may reduce a seven-member code enforcement board to five members, or a five-member code enforcement board to three members, upon the simultaneous expiration of the terms of office of two members of the board.

(6) A member may be reappointed upon approval of the local governing body.

(7) An appointment to fill any vacancy on an enforcement board shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term of office. If any member fails to attend two of three successive meetings without cause and without prior approval of the chairperson, the enforcement board shall declare the member's office vacant, and the local governing body shall promptly fill such vacancy.

(8) The members shall serve in accordance with ordinances of the local governing body and may be suspended and removed for cause as provided in such ordinances for removal of members of boards. A local governing body may, with or without cause, refuse to reappoint any member of an enforcement board at the expiration of his or her term of office.

(d) The members of an enforcement board shall elect a chairperson, who shall be a voting member, from among the members of the board. The presence of four or more members shall constitute a quorum of any seven-member enforcement board, the presence of three or more members shall constitute a quorum of any five-member enforcement board, and the presence of two or more members shall constitute a quorum of any three-member enforcement board. Members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for such travel, mileage, and per diem expenses as may be authorized by the local governing body or as otherwise provided by law.

(e) The local governing body attorney shall either be counsel to an enforcement board or shall represent the municipality or county by presenting cases before the enforcement board but in no case shall the local governing body attorney serve in both capacities.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-42, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-43. Initiating of proceedings; time to correct violations; repeat violations; hearings.

Statute text

(a) It shall be the duty of the code inspector to initiate enforcement proceedings pursuant to the various codes; however, no member of a board shall have the power to initiate such enforcement proceedings.

(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, if a violation of any code or ordinance is found, the code inspector shall notify the violator and give him or her a reasonable time to correct the violation. Should the violation continue beyond the time specified for correction, the code inspector shall proceed with enforcement through the appropriate court or shall proceed with enforcement through the appropriate code enforcement board. If the code inspector proceeds through a code enforcement board, the code inspector shall notify an enforcement board and request a hearing. The code enforcement board shall schedule a hearing, and written notice of such hearing shall be hand delivered or made as provided in Code Section 36-74-49 to said violator. At the option of the code enforcement board, notice may additionally be served by publication or posting as provided in Code Section 36-74-49. If the violation is corrected and then recurs or if the violation is not corrected by the time specified for correction by the code inspector, the case may be presented to the enforcement board even if the violation has been corrected prior to the board hearing, and the notice shall so state.

(c) If a repeat violation is found, the code inspector shall notify the violator but is not required to give the violator a reasonable time to correct the violation. The code inspector, upon notifying the violator of a repeat violation, shall notify an enforcement board and request a hearing. The code enforcement board shall schedule a hearing and shall provide written notice pursuant to Code Section 36-74-49. The case may be presented to the enforcement board even if the repeat violation has been corrected prior to the board hearing, and the notice shall so state.

(d) If the code inspector has substantial reason to believe a violation presents a serious threat to the public health, safety, and welfare or if the violation is irreparable or irreversible in nature, the code inspector shall make a reasonable effort to notify the violator and may immediately notify the enforcement board and request a hearing.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-43, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-44. Calling of hearings; hearing proceedings; orders.

Statute text

(a) Upon request of the code inspector, or at such other times as may be necessary, the chairperson of an enforcement board may call a hearing of an enforcement board; a hearing also may be called by written notice signed by at least three members of a seven-member enforcement board or signed by at least two members of a five-member enforcement board. Minutes shall be kept of all hearings by each enforcement board, and all hearings and proceedings shall be open to the public. The local governing body may provide or assign clerical and administrative personnel to assist the enforcement board in the proper performance of its duties.

(b) Each case before an enforcement board shall be presented by the local governing body attorney or by a code inspector or other member of the administrative staff of the local governing body.

(c) An enforcement board shall proceed to hear the cases on the agenda for that day. All testimony shall be under oath and shall be recorded. The enforcement board shall take testimony from the code inspector and alleged violator. Formal rules of evidence shall not apply, but fundamental due process shall be observed and shall govern the proceedings.

(d) At the conclusion of the hearing, the enforcement board shall issue findings of fact, based on evidence of record and conclusions of law, and shall issue an order to comply or an order to pay an administrative fine consistent with powers granted in this article. The findings and conclusions and any order imposed shall be by motion approved by a majority of those members present and voting, except that at least four members of a seven-member enforcement board, three members of a five-member enforcement board, or two members of a three-member enforcement board must vote in order for the action to be official.

(e) An order to comply shall include notice that it must be complied with by a specified date and that an administrative fine may be imposed if the order is not complied with by such date.

(f) An order to pay a fine shall specify the amount of the fine as determined and voted upon by the enforcement board, as well as the date and time the fine is due. A certified copy of such order may be recorded in the public records of the county and shall constitute notice to any subsequent purchaser, successor in interest, or assign if the violation concerns real property, and the findings therein shall be binding upon the violator and, if the violation concerns real property, and subsequent purchaser, successor in interest, or assign. If an order is recorded in the public records pursuant to this subsection and the fine is paid by the date and time specified in the order, the enforcement board shall issue an order acknowledging that the fine has been paid in full and such order shall be recorded in the public records. A hearing is not required to issue such an order acknowledging the payment of a fine.

(g) The enforcement board may issue an order to pay a fine against the violator if the cited violation was not corrected within the time specified on the code inspector's notice or if an order to comply was not satisfied within the time specified in the order, even if said violation was corrected and brought into compliance prior to the hearing at which the fine is imposed.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-44, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-45. Powers of enforcement boards.

Statute text

Each enforcement board shall have the power to:

(1) Adopt rules for the conduct of its hearings, which rules shall, at a minimum, ensure that each side has an equal opportunity to present evidence and argument in support of its case;

(2) Subpoena alleged violators and witnesses to its hearings, with the approval of the court with jurisdiction over a criminal violator of the county or municipal code or ordinance. Subpoenas may be served by the sheriff, marshal, or police department of the county or by the police department of the municipality or by any other individual authorized by Code Section 24-13-24 to serve subpoenas;

(3) Subpoena evidence to its hearings in the same way as provided in paragraph (2) of this Code section, with the approval of the court with jurisdiction over a criminal violator of the county or municipal code or ordinance;

(4) Take testimony under oath; and

(5) Issue orders having the force of law to command whatever steps are necessary to bring a violation into compliance.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-45, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 52/HB 24.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews. - For article, "Evidence," see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011). For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

36-74-46. Administrative fines; public record.

Statute text

(a) (1) An administrative fine imposed pursuant to this Code section for a violation involving the health or safety of a third party shall not exceed $1,000.00 per day.

(2) An administrative fine imposed pursuant to this Code section for a violation that is not a violation involving the health or safety of a third party shall not exceed a total of $1,000.00.

(3) In determining the amount of the fine, if any, the enforcement board shall consider the following factors:

(A) The gravity of the violation;

(B) Any actions taken by the violator to correct the violation; and

(C) Any previous violations committed by the violator.

(4) An enforcement board may reduce a fine imposed pursuant to this Code section.

(b) A certified copy of an order imposing an administrative fine may be recorded in the public records of any county and thereafter shall constitute a lien against the land on which the violation exists and upon any real or personal property owned by the violator. Upon petition to the superior court, such order may be enforced in the same manner as a court judgment by the sheriffs of this state, including levy against the personal property, but such order shall not be deemed to be a court judgment except for enforcement purposes. After three months from the filing of any such lien which remains unpaid, the enforcement board may request the local governing body attorney to foreclose on the lien.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-46, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-47. Length of liens.

Statute text

No lien imposed under this article shall continue for a period longer than 20 years after the certified copy of an order imposing a fine has been recorded, unless within that time an action to foreclose on the lien is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction. In an action to foreclose on a lien, the prevailing party is entitled to recover all costs, including a reasonable attorney's fee, that it incurs in the foreclosure. The continuation of the lien effected by the commencement of the action shall not be good against creditors or subsequent purchasers for valuable consideration without notice, unless a notice of lis pendens is recorded.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-47, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-48. Appeals to superior court.

Statute text

An aggrieved party, including the local governing body, may appeal a final administrative order of an enforcement board to the superior court of the county in which the subject property is located. Such an appeal shall be in the form of a writ of certiorari governed by Chapter 4 of Title 5 and shall be heard on the record. An appeal shall be filed within 30 days of the execution of the order to be appealed.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-48, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-49. Notice required; form of notice.

Statute text

(a) All notices required by this article shall be provided to the alleged violator by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested; by hand delivery by the sheriff or other law enforcement officer, code inspector, or other person designated by the local governing body; by leaving the notice at the violator's usual place of residence with any person residing therein who is over 15 years of age and informing such person of the contents of the notice; or by leaving the notice at the violator's usual place of business with a manager or other upper-level employee who is over 15 years of age and informing such person of the contents of the notice.

(b) In addition to providing notice as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, at the option of the code enforcement board, notice may also be served by publication or posting, as follows:

(1) Notice may be published once during each week for four consecutive weeks (four publications being sufficient) in the newspaper in which the sheriff's advertisements are printed in the county where the code enforcement board is located. Proof of publication shall be made by affidavit of a duly authorized representative of the newspaper;

(2) If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the county where the code enforcement board is located, three copies of such notice shall be posted for at least 28 days in three different and conspicuous places in such county, one of which shall be at the front door of the courthouse in said county. Proof of posting shall be by affidavit of the person posting the notice, which affidavit shall include a copy of the notice posted and the date and places of its posting; or

(3) Notice by publication or posting may run concurrently with, or may follow, an attempt or attempts to provide notice by hand delivery, mail, or statutory overnight delivery as required under subsection (a) of this Code section. Evidence that an attempt has been made to deliver notice by hand, mail, or statutory overnight delivery as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, together with proof of publication or posting as provided in this subsection, shall be sufficient to show that the notice requirements of this Code section have been met, without regard to whether or not the alleged violator actually received such notice.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-49, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-50. Other enforcement methods.

Statute text

It is the intent of this article to provide an additional or supplemental means of obtaining compliance with local codes. Nothing contained in this article shall prohibit a local governing body through its code inspector from enforcing its codes by any other lawful means including criminal and civil proceedings; provided, however, that a local governing body shall not pursue a specific instance of an alleged violation of an ordinance against one violator before both a code enforcement board and a magistrate, municipal, or other court authorized to hear ordinance violations.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-50, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

——————————

CHAPTER 75

WAR ON TERRORISM LOCAL ASSISTANCE

Sec.

36-75-1. Short title.

36-75-2. Legislative authority; purpose.

36-75-3. Definitions.

36-75-4. Public safety and judicial facilities authorities created for each county and municipality; joint authority; filing with Secretary of State.

36-75-5. Management by board of directors; membership; procedures.

36-75-6. Quorum.

36-75-7. Power of authority.

36-75-8. Bonds and notes; expenditure of revenue.

36-75-9. Responsibility for bonds and obligations.

36-75-10. Construction.

36-75-11. Resolutions and referendums required prior to issuance of bonded indebtedness for new projects; exclusions.

36-75-12. Authorities with maximum amount of outstanding bonded indebtedness to obtain approval by resolution and referendum prior to issuing additional bonds.

36-75-13. Jurisdictions with activated public safety and judicial facilities authorities prohibited from also activating joint public safety and judicial facilities authority.

Annotations

Cross references. - "Bioterrorism" and "Public health emergency" defined, § 31-12-1.1.

36-75-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "War on Terrorism Local Assistance Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 36.)

36-75-2. Legislative authority; purpose.

Statute text

This chapter is enacted pursuant to authority granted to the General Assembly by the Constitution of Georgia. Each authority created by this chapter is created for nonprofit and public purposes; and it is found, determined, and declared that the creation of each such authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes is in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the authority is an institution of purely public charity and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this chapter. For such reasons, the state covenants the holders of the bonds issued under this chapter that such authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its counties, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, or taxing districts upon any property acquired by the authority or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or leased by it to others; or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of any such property or on any income derived by the authority in the form of fees, recording fees, rentals, charges, purchase price, installments, or otherwise; and that the bonds of such authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within the state. The tax exemption provided in this Code section shall not include any exemption from sales and use tax on property purchased by the authority or for use by the authority.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1.)

36-75-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Authority" means each public corporation created pursuant to this chapter.

(2) "Cost of project" means all costs of site preparation and other start-up costs; all costs of construction; all costs of real and personal property required for the purposes of the project and facilities related thereto, including land and any rights or undivided interest therein, easements, franchises, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates, and all machinery and equipment, including motor vehicles which are used for project functions; financing charges and interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the authority may reasonably determine to be necessary for the placing of the project in operation; costs of engineering, architectural, and legal services; cost of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized in this chapter. The costs of any project may also include funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds or notes issued under this chapter for such project.

(3) "County" means any county of this state or a governmental entity formed by the consolidation of a county and one or more municipal corporations.

(4) "Detention facilities" means facilities used or to be used for the incarceration of adult and juvenile offenders and juveniles subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and administration and support structures for such facilities.

(5) "Governing body" means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing body of each county and municipal corporation in the state.

(6) "Judicial facilities" means facilities used or to be used for the administration of justice and related activities, including all adult and juvenile courts, prosecutorial and public defender services, and their respective administrative and support structures.

(7) "Municipal corporation" means any incorporated municipality in this state.

(8) "Project" means the acquisition, construction, equipping, operation, maintenance, and repairing of county or municipal corporation judicial, detention, or public safety facilities.

(9) "Public safety facilities" means facilities used or to be used by or in direct support of management and operation of homeland security, police, fire, rescue, and emergency medical services.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1.)

36-75-4. Public safety and judicial facilities authorities created for each county and municipality; joint authority; filing with Secretary of State.

Statute text

(a) There is created in and for each county and municipal corporation in this state a public body corporate and politic, to be known as the "public safety and judicial facilities authority" of such county. No authority shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this chapter until the governing body of the county or municipal corporation, as the case may be, by proper ordinance or resolution, declares that there is a need for an authority to function in the county or municipal corporation and declares that such jurisdiction is at the time of such ordinance or resolution imposing a sales tax levied for the purposes of a metropolitan area system of public transportation.

(b) Any number of counties or municipal corporations or a combination of counties and municipal corporations may jointly form an authority to be known as the "joint public safety and judicial facilities authority" for such counties or municipal corporations or both. No authority shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this chapter until the governing authority of each county and municipal corporation involved declare, by ordinance or resolution, that there is a need for an authority to function and declare that such jurisdiction is at the time of such ordinance or resolution imposing a sales tax levied for the purposes of a metropolitan area system of public transportation and until the governing authority of each county and municipal corporation approves an agreement with the other counties or municipal corporations for the activation of an authority and such agreement is executed.

(c) A copy of such ordinances, resolutions, and agreements shall be filed with the Secretary of State, who shall maintain a record of all authorities activated under this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 36/SB 465.)

36-75-5. Management by board of directors; membership; procedures.

Statute text

Control and management of the authority shall be vested in a board of directors whose members shall be residents of the county or municipal corporation, as applicable. Directors shall be appointed, and may be reappointed, for terms of four years. The resolution or ordinance activating the authority shall state the number of directors and the appointing authority for each. No member of the governing authority of a county or municipal corporation that activates an authority is eligible to be appointed as a director while serving a term of office as a member of the governing authority of such county or municipal corporation. The directors shall elect one of their members as chairperson and another as vice chairperson and shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer or a secretary-treasurer, either of whom may be a director. The directors shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The directors may make bylaws and regulations for the governing of the authority and may delegate to one or more of the officers, agents, and employees of the authority such powers and duties as may be deemed necessary and proper.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1.)

36-75-6. Quorum.

Statute text

A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the authority. However, any action with respect to any project of the authority must be approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-75-6, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 1.)

36-75-7. Power of authority.

Statute text

Each authority shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

(1) To bring and defend actions;

(2) To adopt and amend a corporate seal;

(3) To acquire, construct, improve, or modify, to place into operation, and to operate or cause to be placed into operation, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others, a project or projects within the political subdivision in which the authority is activated and within other political subdivisions, and to pay all or part of the cost of any such project or projects from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the authority or from any contribution or loans by persons, firms, or corporations or any other contribution, all of which the authority is authorized to receive, accept, and use;
